src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-paanda_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - pānda: # Verb 12 'eng /est panna/fin' - full paradigm
     pānda+V+Inf: pānda
     pānda+V+Ger: pandsõ
     pānda+V+Sup: [paʼnmõ, panmõ]
     pānda+V+Sup+Ine: [paʼnmõõs, panmõõs]
     pānda+V+Sup+Ela: [paʼnmõõst, panmõõst]
     pānda+V+Sup+Tra: [paʼnmõõks, panmõõks]
     pānda+V+Sup+Abe: [paʼnmõõt, panmõõt]
     pānda+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: panāb
     pānda+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [paʼntõ, pantõ]
     pānda+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: panābõd
     pānda+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [paʼņ, paņ]
     pānda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [paʼņtõ, paņtõ]
     pānda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [paʼņtõ, paņtõ]
     pānda+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [paʼn, pan]
     pānda+V+Cond+Sg3: panks
     pānda+V+Imprt+Sg2: [paʼn, pan]
     pānda+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [paʼn, pan]
     pānda+V+Imprt+Pl2: pangid
     pānda+V+Jus+Sg3: pangõ
     pānda+V+QuoSg3: paņņi
     pānda+V+ActPrfPrc: pand
     pānda+V+PssPrfPrc: pandõd
